Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB193.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2644YC (2) 91 ll/js H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 28M.2, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. A county with a population in excess of one hundred 3 seventy-five thousand and participating cities may create, 4 by chapter 28E agreement, a regional transit district in the 5 county pursuant to this chapter . Two or more contiguous 6 counties and participating cities may create, by chapter 7 28E agreement, a regional transit district pursuant to this 8 chapter if one of the counties has a population in excess of 9 one hundred seventy-five thousand . A district shall consist 10 of the unincorporated area of any participating county and the 11 incorporated area of any city in the county that does not have 12 an urban transit system. However, a city without an urban 13 transit system may decline, by resolution forwarded to the 14 board of supervisors, to participate in a regional transit 15 district. 16